West Virginia, session 2026, HB5047.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-5-55. Mobile Career and Technical Education Classroom Program. (a) The Legislature finds that many rural and coalfield counties lack equitable access to career training, arts education, and specialized instructional facilities due to geography, transportation barriers, and limited capital resources.(b) There is hereby created the Mobile Career and Technical Education Classroom Program within the Department of Education.(c) Funds awarded under this section may be used exclusively for:(1) Purchase of buses, handicap buses or vehicles for conversion into mobile classrooms;(2) Conversion, renovation, and equipping of mobile units for career and technical education, workforce training, fine arts instruction, and other specialized educational programs approved by the department;(3) Instructional equipment, technology, and safety modifications necessary to operate mobile classrooms.(d) Funds may not be used for the purchase of standard pupil transportation buses not converted for instructional use.(e) Preference shall be given to counties or municipalities that submit applications jointly with county commissions, career and technical centers, workforce development entities, regional education service agencies, or other public agencies.